sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za gradbeno opremo: Nosilci in ojačitveni nosilci; Okovja za omarice; Koleščki; Verige, žice in vrvi; Vzmeti; Kalupi za beton; Zatiči in palice za moznike; Drsniki za predale; Zaščitna platna; Filtri in mreže; Označevalni in opozorilni trakovi; Plinske cevi; Talni klini; Pritrdilni elementi; Tečaji; Kljuke, zaponke in pritrdilni elementi; Mazalne cevi; Kalupi za litje kovin; Premične in zvočnoizolacijske odeje in prevleke; Pnevmatske cevi; Plošče za pritrditev stebrov; Vzmeti; Ponjave; Shranjevanje in organizacija orodja; Stenske vtičnice in nosilci
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de equipamento: Suportes e apoios de reforço; Equipamento de armário; Rodízios; Correntes, fio e corda; Bobinas; Moldes de betão; Pinos e varas de guia; Laterais de gavetas; Tecidos de revestimento; Ecrãs e filtros; Fita de sinalização e advertência; Mangueiras de gás; Estacas de enterrar; Fixadores de equipamento; Dobradiças; Ganchos, fivelas e fixadores; Mangueiras de lubrificação; Moldes de fundição de metal; Mantas e coberturas de movimentação e insonorização; Mangueiras pneumáticas; Placas de base de poste; Molas; Lonas; Armazenamento e organização de ferramentas; Macacos e suportes de parede
da: Isenkram > Isenkram – tilbehør: Beslag; Skabstilbehør; Møbelhjul; Kæder, wirer og reb; Spoler; Betonforme; Dyvler; Skuffeudtræk; Afdækning; Filtre og skærme; Afmærknings- og advarselstape; Gasslanger; Jordspyd; Fastgøringselementer; Hængsler; Kroge, spænder og befæstelseselementer; Smøremiddelslanger; Forme til metalstøbning; Flytte- og lyddæmpningstæpper; Trykluftsslanger; Stolpefødder; Fjedre; Presenninger; Værktøjsopbevaring og -organisering; Skråstivere til bygningsdele
tr: Hırdavat > Tesisat Aksesuarları: Braketler ve Takviye Bağlantıları; Dolap Hırdavatları; Mobilya Tekerlekleri; Zincir, Kablo ve İp; Bobinler; Beton Kalıplar; Kavilyalar ve Çubuklar; Çekmece Sürgüleri; Mobilya Örtüleri; Filtreler ve Perdeler; İşaretleme ve İkaz Bandı; Gaz Hortumları; Kazıklar; Teçhizat Bağlama Elemanları; Menteşeler; Kancalar, Tokalar ve Sabitleyiciler; Yağlama Hortumları; Metal Döküm Kalıpları; Hareketli ve Ses Geçirmez Şilteler ve Kılıflar; Pnömatik Hortumlar; Direk Ayağı Tabanları; Yaylar; Brandalar; Alet Saklama ve Düzenleme; Duvar Kaldıraçları ve Köşebentleri
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do sprzętu: Wsporniki; Wyposażenie do szaf; Kółka do mebli; Łańcuchy, druty i sznury; Cewki; Odlewy z betonu; Kołki i sworznie; Prowadnice do szuflad; Materiały ochronne; Filtry i ekrany; Taśmy ostrzegawcze i sygnalizacyjne; Węże do gazu; Śledzie i kotwy; Akcesoria mocujące do sprzętu; Zawiasy; Haki, klamry i łączniki; Węże do lubryfikacji; Formy do odlewów metalowych; Pokrowce meblowe do przeprowadzek; Węże pneumatyczne; Podstawy słupów; Sprężyny; Plandeki wodoodporne; Przechowywanie i porządkowanie narzędzi; Podnośniki i podpórki budowlane
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires de quincaillerie: Supports et équerres de renfort; Matériel pour meubles de cuisine; Roulettes; Chaînes, câbles et cordes; Bobines; Moules à béton; Goujons et chevilles; Coulisses pour tiroirs; Toiles de protection; Filtres et tamis; Ruban de signalisation; Tuyaux de gaz; Piquets de sol; Fixations de quincaillerie; Charnières; Crochets, boucles et attaches; Tuyaux de lubrification; Moules de fonderie; Couvertures et draps insonorisés et de protection; Tuyaux pneumatiques; Plaques pour embases de poteaux; Ressorts de quincaillerie; Bâches; Organisation et rangement d’outils; Étais et renforts de murs
es: Bricolaje > Accesorios de bricolaje: Soportes y travesaños; Ferretería para armarios; Ruedas; Cadenas, alambre y cuerda; Espirales; Moldes para hormigón; Espigas y varillas; Rieles para cajones; Tela protectora; Filtros y pantallas; Cinta indicadora y de advertencia; Mangueras de gas; Puntas para anclaje en el suelo; Artículos de ferretería; Bisagras; Ganchos, hebillas y cierres; Mangueras de lubricación; Moldes de fundición de metal; Material de insonorización y transporte; Mangueras neumáticas; Placas de base para postes; Cilindros; Lonas impermeables; Organización y almacenamiento de herramientas; Jabalcones y riostras
vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện phần cứng: Ke góc chữ L; Tủ; Trục lăn; Xích, dây điện và dây thừng; Ống xoắn ruột gà; Khuôn đúc bê tông; Đinh chốt; Thanh trượt ngăn kéo; Rèm thả; Bộ lọc & Màn hình; Băng dính cảnh báo nguy hiểm; Ống dẫn gas; Cọc cắm đất; Móc cài phần cứng; Bản lề; Móc, vòng kẹp & mỏ cặp xiết; Ống tra dầu; Khuôn đúc bằng kim loại; Chăn & phủ di động và chống ốn; Ống khí; Đệm đế; Lò xo; Vải dầu; Cất giữ và sắp xếp dụng cụ; Đòn bẩy & thanh chống tường
hr-HR: Željezarija > Metalni dodaci: Ojačanja i kutna ojačanja; Metalne komponente za ormariće; Kotačići; Lanci, žice i užad; Zavojnice; Kalupi za beton; Klinovi i šipke; Klizači za ladice; Zaštitne prostirke; Filtri i pregrade; Traka za označavanje i upozorenje; Crijeva za plin; Podni šiljci; Pričvrsni elementi; Šarke; Kuke, kopče i zatvarači; Crijeva za podmazivanje; Kalupi za lijevanje metala; Pokrivači i prekrivke za selidbu i zvučnu izolaciju; Pneumatska crijeva; Temeljne ploče za stupove; Opruge; Cerade; Skladištenje i organizacija alata; Zidne dizalice i podupirači
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์ฮาร์ดแวร์: ที่ค้ำและที่ค้ำเสริมแรง; ฮาร์ดแวร์ของตู้; ล้ออุตสาหกรรม; โซ่ ลวด และเชือก; ขดลวด; แม่พิมพ์คอนกรีต; หมุดและก้านสลักนำ; รางเลื่อน; ผ้าคลุมเครื่องเรือน; ตัวกรองและที่กั้น; เทปแจ้งเตือน; สายแก๊ส; แท่งกราวด์; ที่ยึดฮาร์ดแวร์; บานพับ; ตะขอ ห่วง และที่ยึด; สายหล่อลื่น; เบ้าหล่อโลหะ; ผ้าและที่คลุมสำหรับเคลื่อนย้ายและเก็บเสียง; สายนิวแมติกส์; เพลทฐานเสา; สปริง; แผ่นกันน้ำ; การจัดเก็บและการจัดระเบียบเครื่องมือ; อุปกรณ์ค้ำยันกำแพง
nb: Maskinvare > Tilbehør til materiell: Braketter og forsterkningsbraketter; Maskinvare til skap; Hjul; Kjetting, wire og tau; Spoler; Betongformer; Plugger og propper; Skuffskinner; Møbelpresenning; Filtre og skjermer; Advarselstape; Gassledninger; Grunnpigger; Festemidler; Hengsler; Kroker, spenner og festemidler; Smøreslanger; Former for metallstøping; Tepper og trekk for flytting og lydisolering; Pneumatiske slanger; Stolpemonteringsplate; Fjærer; Presenninger; Oppbevaring og organisering av verktøy; Veggjekker og -støtter
ko: 철물 > 철물 부대용품: 받침대/버팀대; 수납장용 철물; 장착형 이동 바퀴; 체인/철사/밧줄; 코일; 콘트리트 몰드; 장부 맞춤 핀/막대; 서랍 레일; 페인트받이 천; 필터/스크린; 경고/주의 테이프; 가스 호스; 그라운드 스파이크; 철물 조임기구; 경첩; 후크/버클/조임기구; 주유 호스; 금속 주조용 몰드; 이사용 보호 패드/방음포/덮개; 공압 호스; 기둥 밑판; 스프링; 방수포; 공구 수납/정리; 벽 지지대/버팀대
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ υλικού: Βάσεις & ενισχυτικές ράβδοι; Υλικό ντουλαπιού; Ροδάκια; Αλυσίδα, σύρμα & σχοινί; Σπείρες; Καλούπια σκυροδέματος; Περόνες σύσφιξης & ράβδοι στήριξης; Ολισθητήρες συρταριών; Υφάσματα κάλυψης; Φίλτρα & Οθόνες; Ταινία επισήμανσης και προειδοποίησης; Σωλήνες αερίου; Ακίδες εδάφους; Συνδετικά εξαρτήματα; Μεντεσέδες; Γάντζοι, πόρπες & συνδετήρες; Σωλήνες λίπανσης; Καλούπια χύτευσης μετάλλων; Κουβέρτες & καλύμματα μεταφοράς & ηχομόνωσης; Πνευματικοί σωλήνες; Βάσεις κολώνων; Ελατήρια; Μουσαμάδες; Αποθήκευση & οργάνωση εργαλείων; Βαλβίδες και σιδεράκια τοίχου
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferragens: Suportes de parede; Ferragens para armários embutidos; Rodízios; Correntes, cabos e cordas; Bobinas; Moldes para concreto; Passadores de pinos e hastes; Corrediças para gavetas; Panos de proteção para reparos; Filtros e peneiras; Faixas sinalizadoras e faixas de isolamento; Mangueiras de gás; Estacas de solo; Parafusos de hardware; Dobradiças; Ganchos, fivelas e prendedores; Mangueiras de lubrificação; Fôrmas para fundição de metal; Mantas e cobertores para transporte e insonorização; Mangueiras pneumáticas; Chapas de suporte para postes; Molas; Lonas; Porta-ferramentas; Alavancas e braçadeiras de parece
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Bauzubehör: Halterungen; Schrankbauteile; Laufrollen; Ketten, Drähte & Seile; Spulen; Betonformen; Zylinderstifte & Dübelstangen; Schubladenschienen; Abdeckfolien; Filter & Siebe; Warnklebeband; Gasschläuche; Bodenspieße; Befestigungselemente; Scharniere; Haken, Schnallen & Verschlüsse; Schmierschläuche; Metallgussformen; Transport- und Schallschutzabdeckungen; Luftschläuche; Standfüße für Pfosten; Federn; Planen; Werkzeugaufbewahrung & Ordnungssysteme; Richtstützen
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для оборудования и технических изделий: Крепежные кронштейны, планки и уголки; Фурнитура для шкафов; Колесики; Цепи, веревки и тросы; Спиральные пружины; Формы для бетона; Установочные штифты и штыри; Направляющие для выдвижных ящиков; Защитная ткань для ремонтных работ; Фильтры и экраны; Маркировочная и оградительная лента; Шланги для подводки газа; Грунтовые колья для крепления опор; Крепежные изделия; Петли; Крюки, пряжки и фиксаторы; Шланги для смазки; Формы для отливки металла; Упаковочные и звукоизоляционные одеяла и чехлы; Пневматические шланги; Опоры для столбов; Пружины; Брезент; Хранение инструментов; Домкраты и опоры для возведения стен
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Bouwbeslag: Beugels; Beslag voor kastjes; Zwenkwielen; Ketting, draad en touw; Spoelen; Betonmallen; Deuvels en pennen; Ladegeleiders; Afdekfolie; Filters en schermen; Markerings- en waarschuwingstape; Gasslangen; Grondankers; Bevestigingsmaterialen; Scharnieren; Haken, spanbanden en bevestigingsmateriaal; Smeerslangen; Metaalgietvormen; Verhuis- en geluidsisolatiedekens; Pneumatische slangen; Voetplaten voor palen; Veren; Afdekdoeken; Gereedschapopslag en -indeling; Bouwstempels en -schoren
bg-BG: Железария > Обков и аксесоари: Скоби и подсилващи планки; Обков за шкафове; Колелца; Вериги, тел и въжета; Спирални пружини; Форми за бетон; Дюбели и прътове; Релси за чекмеджета; Предпазни покривала за ремонт; Филтри и екрани; Маркираща и предупредителна лента; Газови маркучи; Колове за земя; Kрепежни елементи; Панти; Кукички, катарами и закопчалки; Маркучи за гресиране; Метални леярски форми; Одеяла за опаковане на вещи и звукоизолиращи одеяла и покривала; Пневматични маркучи; Планки за основа за стълб; Пружини; Платнища; Съхранение и организация на инструменти; Стенни крикове и скоби
ja: DIY用品 > DIY小物類: ブラケット; キャビネット用品・取付金具; キャスター; チェーン・ワイヤー; コイル; コンクリート型枠; 差し込みダボ・ロッド; 引き出し用スライドレール; 養生シート; フィルター・スクリーン; マーキングテープ・標識テープ; ガスホース; 埋め込み用支柱固定金具; 締結部品; ヒンジ; フック・バックル; 耐油ホース; 鋳型; 養生パッド、防音シート、養生カバー、防音カバー; 耐圧ホース; 支柱固定金具; バネ; 防水シート; 工具保管用品; ウォールジャッキ・支持具
en: Hardware > Hardware Accessories: Brackets & Reinforcement Braces; Cabinet Hardware; Casters; Chain, Wire & Rope; Coils; Concrete Molds; Dowel Pins & Rods; Drawer Slides; Drop Cloths; Filters & Screens; Flagging & Caution Tape; Gas Hoses; Ground Spikes; Hardware Fasteners; Hinges; Hooks, Buckles & Fasteners; Lubrication Hoses; Metal Casting Molds; Moving & Soundproofing Blankets & Covers; Pneumatic Hoses; Post Base Plates; Springs; Tarps; Tool Storage & Organization; Wall Jacks & Braces
sv: Metallprodukter > Tillbehör till järnvaror: Vinkeljärn; Skåpbeslag; Hjul; Kedja, vajer och rep; Rullar; Betonggjutform; Styrpinnar och -stänger; Lådskenor; Skyddstyg; Filter och skärmar; Markerings- och varningstejp; Gasslangar; Markskruvar; Fästen; Gångjärn; Krokar, spännen och fästen; Glidmedelsslangar; Gjutformar för metall; Filtar och skydd för flytt och ljudisolering; Pneumatiska slangar; Stolphållare; Stolpfästen med platta; Fjädrar; Presenningar; Förvaring och organisering av verktyg; Domkraft för lyft av vägg och väggstöd
fi: Rakentaminen > Tarvikkeet: Kiinnikkeet ja kiinnitysraudat; Kaapiston tarvikkeet; Huonekalupyörät; Ketju, vaijeri ja köysi; Kelat; Betonimuotit; Poratapit ja -tangot; Laatikkokiskot; Suojapeitteet; Suodattimet ja seulat; Lippusiima ja varoitusteippi; Kaasuletkut; Maapiikit; Kiinnitys; Saranat; Koukut, salvat ja haat; Voiteluletkut; Metallivalumuotit; Muutto- ja vaimennushuovat ja -peitteet; Paineilmaletkut; Tolpanjalat; Jouset; Kevytpeitteet; Työkalujen säilytys; Levynostimet ja tuet
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori ferramenta: Staffe e supporti di rinforzo; Articoli per mobiletti; Rotelle; Corde, fili e catene; Molle; Blocchi di cemento; Perni e cilindri; Guide per cassetti; Teli protettivi; Filtri e schermature; Nastri segnaletici; Tubi per gas; Picchetti; Avvitatori da ferramenta; Cerniere; Cerniere, ganci e fibbie; Tubi di lubrificazione; Stampi per fusione di metalli; Coperte e coperture per spostamenti e isolamento acustico; Tubi pneumatici; Piastre base per pali; Molle; Teloni di plastica; Conservazione/ordine attrezzi; Staffe e jack da parete
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Techninės įrangos priedai: Gembės ir sutvirtinimo pasparos; Spintelių furnitūra; Ratukai; Grandinės, vielos ir virvės; Ritės; Betono formos; Kaiščiai ir strypai; Stalčių bėgeliai; Baldų uždangalai; Filtrai ir ekranai; Žymėjimo ir įspėjamoji juosta; Dujų žarnos; Žemės smaigaliai; Tvirtinimo detalės; Lankstai; Kabliukai, sagtys ir tvirtinimo detalės; Tepimo žarnos; Metalo liejimo formos; Kraustymosi ir garsą izoliuojantys uždangalai; Pneumatinės žarnos; Stulpų pagrindų plokštės; Spyruoklės; Brezentas; Įrankių saugojimas ir tvarkymas; Sieniniai lizdai ir laikikliai
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii de feronerie: Console și suporturi pentru ranforsare; Elemente de feronerie pentru dulapuri; Rotile; Lanțuri, sârme și funii; Bobine; Cofraje beton; Dibluri și tije; Glisiere pentru sertare; Protecții anti-picături; Filtre și ecrane; Bandă de semnalizare și avertizare; Furtunuri de gaz; Țăruși sol; Elemente de fixare feronerie; Balamale; Cârlige, catarame și elemente de fixare; Furtunuri de lubrifiere; Matrițe pentru turnare metale; Pături și huse pentru mutare și izolare fonică; Furtunuri pneumatice; Plăci de bază pentru stâlpi; Arcuri; Prelate; Depozitarea și organizarea sculelor; Cricuri de perete și suporturi
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Kutilství a řemeslo – příslušenství: Konzoly a výztuhy; Nábytkové kování; Pojezdová kolečka; Řetězy, dráty a provazy; Cívky; Betonové formy; Čepy a kolíky; Zásuvkové výsuvy; Krycí tkaniny; Filtry a síťky; Výstražné a vytyčovací pásky; Plynové hadice; Kotvicí hroty; Spojovací prvky; Závěsy; Háčky, spony a spojky; Mazací hadice; Formy na odlévání kovu; Ochranné a odhlučňovací deky a potahy; Pneumatické hadičky; Patky sloupů; Pružiny; Nepromokavé plachty; Ukládání a organizace nářadí; Zvedáky a podpěry stěn
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 五金配件: 角码/固定支架; 橱柜金属器件; 脚轮; 链子、金属丝和绳子; 线圈; 混凝土模具; 定位销/杆; 抽屉滑轨; 罩单; 过滤器/筛子; 警示带; 燃气软管; 地钉; 五金紧固件; 铰链/合页; 钩子、锁扣与紧固件; 润滑油软管; 金属铸造模具; 保护罩/隔音毯/覆盖物; 气动软管; 立柱底板; 弹簧; 防水布; 工具存储与收纳; 墙壁插孔/支架
hu: Hardver > Hardverkiegészítők: Tartók és erősítő merevítők; Szekrényhardver; Görgők; Lánc, drót és kötél; Tekercsek; Betonformák; Dübelcsapok és rudak; Fiókcsúszkák; Takaráshoz használt vászon; Szűrők és képernyők; Jelző- és figyelmeztetőszalag; Gáztömlők; Földi tüskék; Hardverrögzítők; Zsanérok; Horgok, csatok és rögzítők; Kenőtömlők; Fémöntő formák; Mozgó és hangszigetelő takarók és huzatok; Pneumatikus tömlők; Oszlopalaplemezek; Rugók; Ponyvák; Szerszámtároló és -szervező; Fali csatlakozók és merevítők
zh-TW: 硬體 > 硬體配件: 角托架; 櫥櫃五金配件; 輪腳; 繩索; 線圈; 混凝土模具; 定位銷; 抽屜滑軌; 防塵布; 濾材; 標記/警示膠帶; 瓦斯管; 固定針; 硬體扣件; 鉸鏈; 鐵鉤/扣件; 潤滑軟管; 金屬模具; 家具保護毯/吸音棉; 氣動軟管; 柱座; 彈簧; 防水布; 工具收納; 牆面支撐
sk-SK: Náradie > Príslušenstvo ku kovaniu: Konzoly a výstužné kovanie; Kovanie skriniek; Kolieska; Reťaz, drôt a lano; Cievky; Betónové formy; Montážne kolíky a tyče; Zásuvkové výsuvy; Maliarska fólia; Filtre a obrazovky; Vyznačovacia a výstražná páska; Plynové hadice; Kolíky do zeme; Kovové spojovacie prvky; Pánty; Háčiky, spony a spinky; Mazacie hadice; Kovové odlievacie formy; Prenosné a zvukotesné prikrývky a zásteny; Pneumatické hadice; Základové dosky stĺpikov; Pružiny; Plachty; Uskladnenie a organizácia nástrojov; Nástenné zdviháky a podpery